Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.76.177

Amber alert—Making a false or misleading statement to a public servant.

(1) A person who, with the intent of causing an activation of the voluntary broadcast notification system commonly known as the "Amber alert," or as the same system may otherwise be known, which is used to notify the public of abducted children, knowingly makes a false or misleading material statement to a public servant that a child has been abducted and which statement causes an activation, is guilty of a class C felony.

(2) "Material statement" means a written or oral statement reasonably likely to be relied upon by a public servant in the discharge of his or her official powers or duties.

[ 2008 c 91 s 1.]